Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.050

Contributions for employees and dependents.

(1)(a) Every employer and employer group as defined in RCW 41.05.011 shall provide contributions to insurance and health care plans for its employees and their dependents, the content of such plans to be determined by the authority.

(b) Contributions paid by employer groups for their employees, shall include an amount determined by the authority to pay such administrative expenses of the authority as are necessary to administer the plans for employees of those groups.

(2) To account for any increased cost of benefit plans developed by the board, the authority may develop a rate surcharge applicable to participating employer groups as defined in RCW 41.05.011.

(3) The contributions of any: (a) Department, division, or separate agency of the state government; (b) county, municipal, or other political subdivisions; (c) any tribal government as are covered by this chapter; and (d) school districts, educational service districts, and charter schools, shall be set by the authority, subject to the approval of the governor for availability of funds as specifically appropriated by the legislature for that purpose. Insurance and health care contributions for ferry employees shall be governed by RCW 47.64.270.

(4)(a) For all groups of educational service district employees enrolling in plans developed by the public employees' benefits board after January 1, 2020, and until January 1, 2024, the authority shall collect from each participating educational service district an amount equal to the composite rate charged to state agencies, plus an amount equal to the employee premiums by plan and by family size as would be charged to employees, only if the authority determines that this method of billing the educational service districts will not result in a material difference between revenues from educational service districts and expenditures made by the authority on behalf of educational service districts and their employees. The authority may collect these amounts in accordance with the educational service district fiscal year, as described in RCW 28A.505.030.

(b)(i) Beginning January 1, 2020, all school districts, represented employees of educational service districts, and charter schools shall commence participation in the school employees' benefits board program established under RCW 41.05.740. All school districts, represented employees of educational service districts, charter schools, and all school district employee groups participating in the public employees' benefits board plans before January 1, 2020, shall thereafter participate in the school employees' benefits board program administered by the authority. All school districts, represented employees of educational service districts, and charter schools shall provide contributions to the authority for insurance and health care plans for school employees and their dependents. These contributions must be provided to the authority for all eligible school employees eligible for benefits under RCW 41.05.740(6)(d), including school employees who have waived their coverage; contributions to the authority are not required for individuals eligible for benefits under RCW 41.05.740(6)(e) who waive their coverage.

(ii) Beginning January 1, 2024, all educational service districts shall participate in the school employees' benefits board program.

(5) The authority shall transmit a recommendation for the amount of the employer contributions to the governor and the director of financial management for inclusion in the proposed budgets submitted to the legislature.

[ 2023 c 13 s 4; 2019 c 411 s 5; 2018 c 260 s 10; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 806; 2016 c 67 s 3; 2009 c 537 s 5; 2007 c 114 s 4; 2005 c 518 s 919; 2003 c 158 s 1. Prior: 2002 c 319 s 4; 2002 c 142 s 2; prior: 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 22; 1994 c 309 s 2; 1994 c 153 s 4; prior: 1993 c 492 s 216; 1993 c 386 s 7; 1988 c 107 s 18; 1987 c 122 s 4; 1984 c 107 s 1; 1983 c 15 s 20; 1983 c 2 s 9; prior: 1982 1st ex.s. c 34 s 2; 1981 c 344 s 6; 1979 c 151 s 55; 1977 ex.s. c 136 s 4; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 106 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 38 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 147 s 3; 1970 ex.s. c 39 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 13: See note following RCW 41.05.011.

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Effective date—2009 c 537: See note following RCW 41.05.008.

Intent—Effective date—2007 c 114: See notes following RCW 41.05.011.

Effective date—2005 c 518: See note following RCW 28A.600.110.

Intent—2002 c 319: See note following RCW 41.04.208.

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 28A.400.410.

Intent—Effective dates—1994 c 153: See notes following RCW 41.05.011.

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.

Effective date—1993 c 386 ss 3, 7, and 11: See note following RCW 41.04.205.

Intent—1993 c 386: See note following RCW 28A.400.391.

Severability—1983 c 2: See note following RCW 18.71.030.

Severability—1981 c 344: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 344 s 8.]

Effective date—Conditions prerequisite to implementing sections—1977 ex.s. c 136: "This 1977 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1977: PROVIDED, That if the state operating budget appropriations act does not contain the funds necessary for the implementation of this 1977 amendatory act in an appropriated amount sufficient to fully fund the employer's contribution to the state employee insurance benefits program which is established by the board in accordance with RCW 41.05.050 (2) and (3) as now or hereafter amended, sections 1, 5, and 6 of this 1977 amendatory act shall be null and void." [ 1977 ex.s. c 136 s 8.]

Effective date—Effect of veto—1973 1st ex.s. c 147: "This bill shall not take effect until the funds necessary for its implementation have been specifically appropriated by the legislature and such appropriation itself has become law. It is the intention of the legislature that if the governor shall veto this section or any item thereof, none of the provisions of this bill shall take effect." [ 1973 1st ex.s. c 147 s 10.]

Savings—1973 1st ex.s. c 147: "Nothing contained in this 1973 amendatory act shall be deemed to amend, alter or affect the provisions of Chapter 23, Laws of 1972, Extraordinary Session, and RCW 28B.10.840 through 28B.10.844 as now or hereafter amended." [ 1973 1st ex.s. c 147 s 13.]

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 147: "If any provision of this 1973 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1973 1st ex.s. c 147 s 9.]

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 39: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1970 ex.s. c 39 s 14.]